Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5756.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Cannabis regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001, renamed the cannabis regulatory agency under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2022-1, MCL 333.27002. (b) "Contract processing" means extraction, distillation, or other extraction refinement methods performed by a marihuana processor on raw marihuana plant material for a fee in accordance with an agreement between the marihuana processor and a marihuana grower. (c) (b) "Cultivate" means to propagate, breed, grow, harvest, dry, cure, or separate parts of a marihuana plant by manual or mechanical means. (d) (c) "Department" means the cannabis regulatory agency. (e) (d) "Indian lands" means any of the following: (i) All lands within the limits of an Indian reservation. (ii) Any lands title to which is either held in trust by the United States for the benefit of any Indian tribe or individual or held by any Indian tribe or individual subject to restriction by the United States against alienation and over which an Indian tribe exercises governmental power. (f) (e) "Indian tribe" means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians which is recognized as eligible by the United States Secretary of the Interior for the special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians, and is recognized as possessing powers of self-government. (g) (f) "Industrial hemp" means any of the following: (i) A plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight basis. (ii) A part of a plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight basis. (iii) The seeds of a plant of the genus Cannabis with a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight basis. (iv) If it has a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight basis, a compound, manufacture, derivative, mixture, preparation, extract, cannabinoid, acid, salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer of any of the following: (A) A plant of the genus Cannabis. (B) A part of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (v) A product to which 1 of the following applies: (A) If the product is intended for human or animal consumption, the product, in the form in which it is intended for sale to a consumer, meets both of the following requirements: (I) Has a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight or per volume basis. (II) Contains a total amount of THC that is less than or equal to the limit established by the cannabis regulatory agency under section 8(1)(n). (B) If the product is not intended for human or animal consumption, the product meets both of the following requirements: (I) Contains a substance listed in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv). (II) Has a THC concentration of 0.3% or less on a dry-weight basis. (h) (g) "Licensee" means a person holding a state license. (i) (h) "Marihuana" means any of the following: (i) A plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not. (ii) A part of a plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not. (iii) The seeds of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (iv) Marihuana concentrate. (v) A compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, extract, acid, isomer, salt of an isomer, or preparation of any of the following: (A) A plant of the genus Cannabis. (B) A part of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (C) The seeds of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (D) Marihuana concentrate. (vi) A marihuana-infused product. (vii) A product with a THC concentration of more than 0.3% on a dry-weight or per volume basis in the form in which it is intended for sale to a consumer. (viii) A product that is intended for human or animal consumption and that contains, in the form in which it is intended for sale to a consumer, a total amount of THC that is greater than the limit established by the cannabis regulatory agency under section 8(1)(n). (j) (i) Except for marihuana concentrate extracted from any of the following, "marihuana" does not include any of the following: (i) The mature stalks of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (ii) Fiber produced from the mature stalks of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (iii) Oil or cake made from the seeds of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (iv) A compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (v) Industrial hemp. (vi) An ingredient combined with marihuana to prepare topical or oral administrations, food, drink, or other products. (vii) A drug for which an application filed in accordance with 21 USC 355 is approved by the Food and Drug Administration. (k) (j) "Marihuana accessories" means any equipment, product, material, or combination of equipment, products, or materials, that is specifically designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marihuana into the human body. (l) (k) "Marihuana concentrate" means the resin extracted from any part of a plant of the genus Cannabis. (m) (l) "Marihuana establishment" means a marihuana grower, marihuana safety compliance facility, marihuana processor, marihuana microbusiness, marihuana retailer, marihuana secure transporter, or any other type of marihuana-related business licensed by the cannabis regulatory agency. (n) (m) "Marihuana grower" means a person licensed to cultivate marihuana and sell or otherwise transfer marihuana to marihuana establishments. (o) (n) "Marihuana-infused product" means a topical formulation, tincture, beverage, edible substance, or similar product containing marihuana and other ingredients and that is intended for human consumption. (p) (o) "Marihuana microbusiness" means a person licensed to cultivate not more than 150 marihuana plants; process and package marihuana; and sell or otherwise transfer marihuana to individuals who are 21 years of age or older or to a marihuana safety compliance facility, but not to other marihuana establishments. (q) (p) "Marihuana processor" means a person licensed to obtain marihuana from marihuana establishments; process and package marihuana; and sell or otherwise transfer marihuana to marihuana establishments. (r) (q) "Marihuana retailer" means a person licensed to obtain marihuana from marihuana establishments and to sell or otherwise transfer marihuana to marihuana establishments and to individuals who are 21 years of age or older. (s) (r) "Marihuana safety compliance facility" means a person licensed to test marihuana, including certification for potency and the presence of contaminants. (t) (s) "Marihuana secure transporter" means a person licensed to obtain marihuana from marihuana establishments in order to transport marihuana to marihuana establishments. (u) (t) "Marijuana regulatory agency", unless the context dictates otherwise, means the cannabis regulatory agency. (v) (u) "Municipal license" means a license issued by a municipality pursuant to section 16 that allows a person to operate a marihuana establishment in that municipality. (w) (v) "Municipality" means a city, village, or township. (x) (w) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership of any type, trust, or other legal entity. (y) (x) "Process" or "processing" means to separate or otherwise prepare parts of a marihuana plant and to compound, blend, extract, infuse, or otherwise make or prepare marihuana concentrate or marihuana-infused products. (z) (y) "Qualifying Indian tribe" means an Indian tribe that meets all of the following conditions: (i) The Indian tribe has entered into an agreement with the cannabis regulatory agency under section 7(2)(b) that is in effect. (ii) The Indian tribe has entered into an agreement with the department of treasury that is in effect and that does all of the following: (A) States that the revenue collected from the tax or fee described in subparagraph (iii) is not state money, and requires that this revenue be retained by and used as determined by only the Indian tribe, if the marihuana subject to the tax or fee was grown and processed on only the Indian tribe's Indian lands. (B) States whether the revenue collected from the tax or fee described in subparagraph (iii) from marihuana not described in sub-subparagraph (A) is subject to revenue sharing between the Indian tribe and this state and, if so, the details of the revenue sharing arrangement. (iii) The Indian tribe imposes a tax or fee on each sale or transfer of marihuana from a tribal marihuana business located in the Indian tribe's Indian lands to a person other than a tribal marihuana business or marihuana establishment. This subparagraph does not prohibit a qualifying Indian tribe from imposing the tax or fee on sales or transfers of marihuana that are not described in this subparagraph. The tax or fee must be based on the sales price of the marihuana and the rate of the tax or fee must be equal to or greater than the rate established under section 13. (aa) "Raw marihuana plant material" means marihuana that has not been tested by a marihuana safety compliance facility and has not gone through extraction, distillation, or other extraction refinement methods. (bb) (z) "State license" means a license issued by the cannabis regulatory agency that allows a person to operate a marihuana establishment. (cc) (aa) "THC" means any of the following: (i) Tetrahydrocannabinolic acid. (ii) Unless excluded by the cannabis regulatory agency under section 8(2)(c), a tetrahydrocannabinol , regardless of whether it is artificially or naturally derived. (iii) A tetrahydrocannabinol that is a structural, optical, or geometric isomer of a tetrahydrocannabinol described in subparagraph (ii).or tetrahydrocannabinolic acid. THC includes a cannabinoid that has similar effects or is marketed as having similar effects to tetrahydrocannabinol as determined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under 7 USC 1639o. (dd) (bb) "Tribal marihuana business" means a business that meets all of the following conditions: (i) The business engages in the type of activities licensed under this act. (ii) The business is not a marihuana establishment. (iii) The business is wholly owned by a qualifying Indian tribe, the enrolled members of a qualifying Indian tribe, or a combination of a qualifying Indian tribe and the members of that qualifying Indian tribe. (iv) The business is located in this state and in the Indian lands of the qualifying Indian tribe described in subparagraph (iii). (v) The business is subject to a tax or fee described in subdivision (y)(iii).(z)(iii). (ee) (cc) "Unreasonably impracticable" means that the measures necessary to comply with the rules or ordinances adopted pursuant to this act subject licensees to unreasonable risk or require such a high investment of money, time, or any other resource or asset that a reasonably prudent businessperson would not operate the marihuana establishment. Sec. 8. (1) The cannabis regulatory agency shall promulgate rules to implement and administer this act that include all of the following: (a) Procedures for issuing a state license pursuant to section 9 and for renewing, suspending, and revoking a state license. (b) A schedule of fees in amounts not more than necessary to pay for implementation, administration, and enforcement costs of this act and that relate to the size of each licensee or the volume of business conducted by the licensee. (c) Qualifications for licensure that are directly and demonstrably related to the operation of a marihuana establishment. However, a prior conviction solely for a marihuana-related offense must not disqualify an individual or otherwise affect eligibility for licensure, unless the offense involved distribution of a controlled substance to a minor. (d) Requirements and standards for safe cultivation, processing, and distribution of marihuana by marihuana establishments, including health standards to ensure the safe preparation of marihuana-infused products and prohibitions on pesticides that are not safe for use on marihuana. (e) Testing, packaging, and labeling standards, procedures, and requirements for marihuana, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) A maximum THC level for marihuana-infused products. (ii) A requirement that a representative sample of marihuana be tested by a marihuana safety compliance facility. (iii) A requirement that the amount of marihuana or marihuana concentrate contained within a marihuana-infused product be specified on the product label. (iv) A requirement that all marihuana sold through marihuana retailers and marihuana microbusinesses include on the exterior of the marihuana packaging the following warning printed in clearly legible type and surrounded by a continuous heavy line: WARNING: USE BY PREGNANT OR BREASTFEEDING WOMEN, OR BY WOMEN PLANNING TO BECOME PREGNANT, MAY RESULT IN FETAL INJURY, PRETERM BIRTH, LOW BIRTH WEIGHT, OR DEVELOPMENTAL PROBLEMS FOR THE CHILD. (f) Security requirements, including lighting, physical security, and alarm requirements, and requirements for securely transporting marihuana between marihuana establishments. The requirements described in this subdivision must not prohibit cultivation of marihuana outdoors or in greenhouses. (g) Record keeping requirements for marihuana establishments and monitoring requirements to track the transfer of marihuana by licensees. The monitoring requirements must allow for the cannabis regulatory agency to prevent a marihuana establishment from selling, purchasing, or otherwise transferring marihuana if the cannabis regulatory agency has suspended or revoked the marihuana establishment's state license. (h) Requirements for the operation of marihuana secure transporters to ensure that all marihuana establishments are properly serviced. (i) Reasonable restrictions on advertising, marketing, and display of marihuana and marihuana establishments. (j) A plan to promote and encourage participation in the marihuana industry by people from communities that have been disproportionately impacted by marihuana prohibition and enforcement and to positively impact those communities. (k) Penalties for failure to comply with a rule promulgated pursuant to this section or for a violation of this act by a licensee, including civil fines and suspension, revocation, or restriction of a state license. (l) Informational pamphlet standards for marihuana retailers and marihuana microbusinesses, including, but not limited to, a requirement to make available to every customer at the time of sale a pamphlet measuring 3.5 inches by 5 inches that includes safety information related to marihuana use by minors and the poison control hotline number. (m) Procedures and standards for approving an appointee to operate a marihuana establishment under section 9a. (n) A limit on the total amount of THC that a product described in section 3(f)(v)(A) may contain. (2) The cannabis regulatory agency may promulgate rules to do any either of the following: (a) Provide for the issuance of additional types or classes of state licenses to operate marihuana-related businesses, including licenses that authorize any of the following: (i) Limited cultivation, processing, transportation, delivery, storage, sale, or purchase of marihuana. (ii) Consumption of marihuana within designated areas. (iii) Consumption of marihuana at special events in limited areas and for a limited time. (iv) Cultivation for purposes of propagation. (v) Facilitation of scientific research or education. (b) Regulate the cultivation, processing, distribution, and sale of industrial hemp. (c) Exclude from the definition of THC in section 3 a tetrahydrocannabinol if, after the cannabis regulatory agency makes findings with respect to each of the following factors, the cannabis regulatory agency determines that the tetrahydrocannabinol does not have a potential for abuse: (i) The actual or relative potential for abuse of the tetrahydrocannabinol. (ii) The scientific evidence of the tetrahydrocannabinol's pharmacological effect, if known. (iii) The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the tetrahydrocannabinol. (iv) The history and current pattern of abuse of the tetrahydrocannabinol. (v) The scope, duration, and significance of abuse of the tetrahydrocannabinol. (vi) The tetrahydrocannabinol's risk to the public health. (vii) The potential of the tetrahydrocannabinol to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability. (3) The cannabis regulatory agency shall not promulgate a rule that is unreasonably impracticable or that does any of the following: (a) Establishes a limit on the number of any type of state license that may be granted. (b) Requires a customer to provide a marihuana retailer with identifying information other than identification to determine the customer's age or requires the marihuana retailer to acquire or record personal information about customers other than information typically required in a retail transaction. (c) Prohibits a marihuana establishment from operating at a shared location of a marihuana facility operating pursuant to the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, or prohibits a marihuana grower, marihuana processor, or marihuana retailer from operating within a single facility. (4) A rule promulgated under this act must be promulgated pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 9b. (1) A marihuana establishment that purchases marihuana from another marihuana establishment shall pay for the marihuana and pay all applicable taxes, including the tax described in section 9d(2), in full by electronic funds transfer not later than 1 business day after the date that the marihuana is delivered unless the sale is between marihuana establishments that are under common ownership or control. (2) A marihuana establishment that engages the services of a marihuana safety compliance facility shall pay for the services in full by electronic funds transfer not later than 3 business days after the date that the marihuana safety compliance facility provides the final results of the services and the associated invoice to the marihuana establishment. A marihuana establishment that engages the services of a marihuana secure transporter shall pay for the services in full by electronic funds transfer not later 3 business days after the date that the marihuana secure transporter renders the services, as evidenced by the cannabis regulatory agency's tracking requirements, and provides the associated invoice to the marihuana establishment. (3) A marihuana safety compliance facility or marihuana secure transporter, or a marihuana establishment that sells marihuana to another marihuana establishment, shall clearly list the marihuana safety compliance facility's, marihuana secure transporter's, or selling marihuana establishment's account instructions for electronic funds transfer on each invoice that it provides to a marihuana establishment, including the account name, account number, routing number, and address of the financial institution. (4) Subject to subsection (5), a marihuana establishment shall not do any of the following: (a) Extend or accept credit, issue promissory notes, or permit any other deferred-payment arrangement for the sale or purchase of marihuana by another marihuana establishment. (b) Directly or indirectly aid or assist another marihuana establishment by giving a gift, loan of money or other thing of value, or a premium or rebate. (c) Accept a gift, loan of money or other thing of value, or a premium or rebate from another marihuana establishment. (5) Subsection (4) does not apply to conduct between marihuana establishments that are under common ownership or control. (6) Not later than 10 days after the date that a marihuana establishment violates this section, the cannabis regulatory agency shall take disciplinary action against the marihuana establishment. In addition to all other sanctions provided for under this act, the disciplinary action must include a civil fine of not less than 10% of the invoiced amount of the transaction. (7) This section does not apply to transfers of marihuana associated with contract processing if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The marihuana processor does not hold title to the marihuana. (b) The marihuana processor returns the marihuana to the marihuana grower not later than 30 days after the date that the marihuana processor receives the marihuana from the marihuana grower. (8) For purposes of this section, marihuana establishments are considered to be under common ownership or control if the same person or persons hold, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of the economic interest and more than 50% of the voting interest or voting control in the marihuana establishments. (9) This section applies to a contract that is entered into before, on, or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (10) As used in this section, "electronic funds transfer" means a transfer of money initiated through electronic means, including, but not limited, through an automated clearing house, wire transfer, debit authorization, or any other form of electronic communication used to instruct a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Sec. 9c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a marihuana establishment may return marihuana that it purchased from another marihuana establishment if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The marihuana establishment returns the marihuana not later than 3 business days after the date that the marihuana establishment takes delivery of the marihuana. (b) The return is conducted by a marihuana secure transporter and is recorded in accordance with the cannabis regulatory agency's rules. (c) If the marihuana is sold in bulk or is not packaged for individual sale, the marihuana establishment returns all of the marihuana. (d) The marihuana is in its original form and is unused and unadulterated. (2) A marihuana establishment may return marihuana after the period described in subsection (1)(a) if 1 or more of the following conditions are met: (a) The marihuana does not comply with the packaging or labeling requirements established by the cannabis regulatory agency. (b) The purchasing marihuana establishment fails to comply with section 9b(1). (c) The cannabis regulatory agency or selling marihuana establishment has issued a safety recall for the marihuana. (3) A marihuana establishment shall not process a return of marihuana unless all of the applicable requirements of this section are met. If a selling marihuana establishment processes a return of marihuana in accordance with this section, the selling marihuana establishment shall refund the purchasing marihuana establishment the price that the purchasing marihuana establishment paid for the marihuana not later than 3 business days after the date that the selling marihuana establishment takes delivery of the returned marihuana. (4) Not later than 10 days after the date that a marihuana establishment violates this section, the cannabis regulatory agency shall take disciplinary action against the marihuana establishment. In addition to all other sanctions provided for under this act, the disciplinary action must include a civil fine of not less than 10% of the invoiced amount of the transaction. (5) This section does not apply to transfers of marihuana associated with contract processing if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The marihuana processor does not hold title to the marihuana. (b) The marihuana processor returns the marihuana to the marihuana grower not later than 30 days after the date that the marihuana processor receives the marihuana from the marihuana grower. (6) This section applies to a contract that is entered into before, on, or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. Sec. 9d. (1) A marihuana establishment shall collect and remit all taxes required by law in accordance with the applicable law. (2) A marihuana establishment that is a marihuana retail licensee shall, in accordance with section 9b(1), pay the tax imposed under the comprehensive road funding tax act, 2025 PA 23, MCL 205.901 to 205.913, if another marihuana establishment that is subject to the tax imposed under the comprehensive road funding tax act, 2025 PA 23, MCL 205.901 to 205.913, requires the marihuana establishment to pay that tax. (3) If a marihuana establishment violates subsection (1), the department of treasury shall notify the cannabis regulatory agency not later than 5 business days after the date of the violation. If a marihuana retail licensee violates subsection (2), the selling marihuana establishment shall notify the cannabis regulatory agency not later than 5 business days after the date of the violation. (4) The cannabis regulatory agency shall take disciplinary action against a marihuana establishment that violates subsection (1) or (2). In addition to all other sanctions provided for by law, a marihuana establishment that violates subsection (1) or (2) is subject to 1 or more of the following, as applicable: (a) A civil fine of not less than 10% of any outstanding tax due and owing to the department of treasury that is more than 5 business days in arrears. (b) A civil fine of not less than 10% of any outstanding tax due and owing to the selling marihuana establishment that is more than 5 business days in arrears. (c) If all outstanding taxes and applicable fines are not paid in full within 30 days after the original due date, immediate suspension of the marihuana establishment's state license. (d) If all outstanding taxes and applicable fines are not paid in full within 90 days after the original due date, revocation of the marihuana establishment's state license. (5) Upon the suspension or permanent revocation of a marihuana establishment's state license under this section, the cannabis regulatory agency shall do both of the following: (a) Immediately notify the department of state police and coordinate with the department of state police to ensure that the marihuana establishment has ceased operations. (b) Immediately exercise the cannabis regulatory agency's authority under section 8(1)(g) to prevent the marihuana establishment from selling, purchasing, or otherwise transferring marihuana unless authorized by the cannabis regulatory agency. (6) An owner of a marihuana establishment that has had its state license revoked under this section is ineligible to hold any other state license. (7) As used in this section, "marihuana retail licensee" means that term as defined in section 3 of the comprehensive road funding tax act, 2025 PA 23, MCL 205.903. Sec. 9e. (1) A person shall not hold itself out as operating a marihuana establishment if the person does not hold a state license to operate that marihuana establishment or if the person's state license to operate that marihuana establishment is suspended, revoked, lapsed, or void, or was fraudulently obtained or transferred to the person other than in accordance with this act or the rules promulgated by the cannabis regulatory agency under this act. (2) A person that violates subsection (1) shall not sell or otherwise transfer marihuana to another person. (3) If a person violates subsection (1), the cannabis regulatory agency shall impose a civil fine against the person of not less than 50% of the then current annual licensing fee for each state license that is the subject of the violation. (4) Upon imposing a civil fine under subsection (3), the cannabis regulatory agency shall immediately notify the department of state police and coordinate with the department of state police to ensure that the person has ceased operations and that the person does not, unless required by the cannabis regulatory agency or the department of state police, sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of marihuana. Sec. 9f. (1) A marihuana establishment shall submit to the cannabis regulatory agency annual financial statements in accordance with the rules promulgated by the cannabis regulatory agency under this act. The financial statements must accurately reconcile the marihuana establishment's records with the marihuana establishment's transactions as required by the rules promulgated by the cannabis regulatory agency under this act. (2) If a marihuana establishment violates subsection (1), the cannabis regulatory agency shall impose a civil fine of not less than $30,000.00 against the marihuana establishment. If the marihuana establishment fails to submit annual financial statements within 30 days after the original due date, the cannabis regulatory agency shall summarily suspend all of the marihuana establishment's state licenses until the marihuana establishment submits the annual financial statements in accordance with subsection (1). If the marihuana establishment fails to submit annual financial statements within 90 days after the original due date, the cannabis regulatory agency shall immediately revoke all of the marihuana establishment's state licenses, and an owner of the marihuana establishment is ineligible to hold any other state license until both of the following requirements are met: (a) The marihuana establishment is in full compliance with subsection (1). (b) The marihuana establishment pays all outstanding fees and fines to the cannabis regulatory agency. (3) If a marihuana establishment submits annual financial statements that do not comply with subsection (1), the cannabis regulatory agency shall provide to the marihuana establishment an initial notice of deficiency that allows the marihuana establishment an opportunity to correct the annual financial statements within 30 days after the original due date. If the marihuana establishment fails to submit annual financial statements that comply with subsection (1) within the 30-day time period, the cannabis regulatory agency shall summarily suspend all of the marihuana establishment's state licenses until the marihuana establishment submits annual financial statements that comply with subsection (1). If the marihuana establishment fails to submit annual financial statements that comply with subsection (1) within 90 days after the original due date, the cannabis regulatory agency shall immediately revoke all of the marihuana establishment's state licenses and impose a civil fine of not less than $30,000.00 against the marihuana establishment. An owner of a marihuana establishment that has had its state license revoked under this section is ineligible to hold any other state license. (4) Upon the suspension or permanent revocation of a marihuana establishment's state license under this section, the cannabis regulatory agency shall do both of the following: (a) Immediately notify the department of state police and coordinate with the department of state police to ensure that the marihuana establishment has ceased operations. (b) Immediately exercise the cannabis regulatory agency's authority under section 8(1)(g) to prevent the marihuana establishment from selling, purchasing, or otherwise transferring marihuana unless authorized by the cannabis regulatory agency. Sec. 14. (1) The marihuana regulation fund is created in the state treasury. The department of treasury shall deposit into the fund all money collected under section 13 and all money collected by the department of treasury in accordance with an agreement described in section 3(y)(ii), 3(z)(ii), and the cannabis regulatory agency shall deposit into the fund all fees collected under this act. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund and shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. The cannabis regulatory agency shall administer the fund for auditing purposes. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. (2) Funds for the initial activities of the cannabis regulatory agency to implement this act shall be appropriated from the general fund. The cannabis regulatory agency shall repay any amount appropriated under this subsection from proceeds in the fund. (3) The cannabis regulatory agency shall expend money in the fund as follows: (a) For the implementation, administration, and enforcement of this act. (b) Until 2022 or for at least 2 years, whichever is later, for 1 or more development and research projects, including clinical trials, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and sponsored by a nonprofit organization or researcher within an academic institution researching the efficacy of marihuana in treating the medical conditions and preventing the suicide of United States Armed Services veterans. The cannabis regulatory agency shall expend $20,000,000.00 per year under this subdivision. (4) Upon appropriation, the unexpended balances in the fund must be allocated as follows: (a) Subject to subsection (5), 15% to municipalities in which a marihuana retailer or marihuana microbusiness is located, allocated in proportion to the number of marihuana retailers and marihuana microbusinesses within each municipality. (b) Subject to subsection (5), 15% to counties in which a marihuana retailer or marihuana microbusiness is located, allocated in proportion to the number of marihuana retailers and marihuana microbusinesses within each county. (c) 35% to the school aid fund to be used for K-12 education. (d) 35% to the Michigan transportation fund to be used for the repair and maintenance of roads and bridges. (5) If a marihuana retailer or marihuana microbusiness is located in Indian lands, the portions of the unexpended balances attributable to the marihuana retailer or marihuana microbusiness that would have otherwise been allocated to a municipality under subsection (4)(a) and a county under subsection (4)(b) must instead be allocated to the Indian tribe in whose Indian lands the marihuana retailer or marihuana microbusiness is located.